Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-402.02
Life insurance; reserves; separate accounts; gains and losses.

The income, gains and losses, realized or unrealized, from assets allocated to a separate account shall be credited to or charged against such account, without regard to other income, gains or losses of such company.

Laws 1972, LB 771, § 2.